Colorado, session 2026A, HB1374.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-6-904.5, amend (2)
and (3); and add (8) as follows:
26-6-904.5. Kinship foster care homes - certification and
revocation of certification - financial assistance and supports - training
- interagency resource data - report - rules - repeal.
(2) CERTIFIED kinship foster care homes are eligible for financial
reimbursement and supports at the same rate as foster care homes, as
established in rules promulgated ADOPTED by the state board of human
services. Non-certified kinship care homes are eligible for financial
assistance and supports at thirty percent of the foster care rate, based on the
age of the child or youth receiving care. Beginning in state fiscal year
2026-27, non-certified kinship care homes are eligible for financial
assistance and support at fifty percent of the foster care rate, based on the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

age of the child or youth receiving care. Funding to cover financial
assistance and supports comes from the revenue stream identified in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) (a) The state department shall, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
APPROPRIATIONS, reimburse the county departments ninety percent of the
amounts expended by county departments for CERTIFIED kinship foster care
and non-certified kinship care daily rates to support financial assistance.
The kinship foster care rate and non-certified kinship care rate are exempt
from the close-out process described in section 26-5-104 (3).
(b) For state fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26, the general assembly
may appropriate money from the Colorado long-term works reserve, created
in section 26-2-721, for the purposes of providing the funding required by
subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A COUNTY DEPARTMENT IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE AND SUPPORTS FOR NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP CARE, EXCEPT AS
REQUIRED BY SECTION 475 OF THE FEDERAL"SOCIAL SECURITY ACT", 42
U.S.C. SEC. 675, OR SECTIONS 19-3-208 AND 19-3-403 (3.6)(c) AND (9).
(8) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE A STANDARDIZED
NOTICE FOR NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP CARE PROVIDERS REGARDING THE
DISCONTINUATION OF NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP CARE ASSISTANCE. THE
NOTICE MUST SPECIFY THE DATE NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP CARE ASSISTANCE
ENDS AND PROVIDE INFORMATION REGARDING THE OPTION FOR THE
NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP CARE PROVIDER TO BECOME A CERTIFIED KINSHIP
CARE PROVIDER, IF ELIGIBLE, INCLUDING THE OPTION FOR PROVISIONAL
CERTIFICATION. EACH COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES
SHALL PROVIDE THE NOTICE, NO LATER THAN JUNE 15, 2026, TO ALL
NON-CERTIFIED KINSHIP FOSTER CARE HOMES CURRENTLY RECEIVING
MONTHLY PAYMENTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-3-702, amend (3)
introductory portion as follows:
19-3-702. Permanency hearing.
(3) At any permanency planning hearing, the court shall first
determine if the child or youth should be returned to the child's or youth's
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1374

parent, named guardian, or legal custodian and, if applicable, the date on
which the child or youth must be returned. If the child or youth cannot be
returned home, the court shall also determine whether reasonable efforts
have been made to find a safe and stable permanent home for the child or
youth. The court shall not delay permanency planning by considering the
placement of children or youth together as a sibling group or for purposes
of maintaining financial support for a CERTIFIED kinship foster care home,
or a non-certified kinship care home, unless there are exceptional
circumstances approved by the court. At any permanency planning hearing,
the court shall make the following determinations, when applicable:
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-3-403, amend
(3.6)(a)(IV) introductory portion and (3.6)(a)(IV)(B) as follows:
19-3-403. Temporary custody - hearing - time limits - restriction
- rules.
(3.6) (a) (IV) The court shall order a county department of human
or social services to exercise due diligence to contact all grandparents and
other adult relatives and identified kin within thirty days after the removal
of the child or youth and to inform them about placement possibilities for
the child or youth, unless the court determines there is good cause not to
contact or good cause to delay contacting the child's or youth's relatives and
kin, including, but not limited to, family or domestic violence.
(B) The notice must include information about providing care for
the child or youth while the family receives reunification services, with the
goal of returning the child or youth to the parent or legal guardian; the
relative's right to intervene in the proceedings with or without an attorney
following adjudication; and additional services and supports that are
available in out-of-home placements. The notice must also include
information regarding the state's entitlement plans, including, but not
limited to, child care assistance, supplemental nutritional assistance
programs, the relative guardianship assistance program, child-only
eligibility for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), and adoption
assistance, as well as other options for contact. Information about family
foster care certification, including how to request a variance from
certification standards that do not present a safety or health risk to the child
or youth in the home OBTAIN A PROVISIONAL CERTIFICATION, and supports
that are available for relatives and kin and children or youth and what
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1374

background checks are required, as well as how relatives or kin may request
the court review decisions to deny placement based on background checks
and why certification as a kinship foster home may be denied, must also be
provided in the notice.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 26-6-904.5 (2) and (3), Colorado Revised Statutes, as
amended in section 1 of this act, and section 2 of this act take effect on July
1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1374

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1374